Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1410
Candidate committee, defined.

Candidate committee shall mean the committee designated in a candidate's filed statement of organization as that individual's candidate committee. A candidate committee shall be presumed to be under the control and direction of the candidate named in the same statement of organization, except that the candidate for Lieutenant Governor shall not have a separate candidate committee but shall be included in the candidate committee with the candidate for Governor of the same political party.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 10;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 768, § 11.